Missouri, session 2026, HB7.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
Section 7.000. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of
a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed
to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the stated
appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified
as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to
any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 2
Section 7.005. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Regional Engagement Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.195
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,710,496
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 784,892
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,495,338
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development - Community Development
Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123) ..........................................................63,521
Personal Service ..................................................................................................355,018
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 60,136
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ........................................................415,154
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund (1547) ....................22,170
Expense and Equipment
From International Promotions Revolving Fund (1567) ................................................600,001
Expense and Equipment
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ............................................355,000
For regional engagement and minority participation and inclusion efforts
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................91,666
For International Trade and Investment Offices
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) .........................................1,500,000
For business recruitment and marketing
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ................................. 3,500,000
Total (Not to exceed 33.88 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$9,042,900
Section 7.006. To the Department of Economic Development
For an organization committed to providing a safe and efficient
transportation system located in any county with more than two
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 3
inhabitants for the purpose of maintenance, repair, and upgrades
to Route MM at the intersections of U.S. Highway 60 and I-44,
as well as the length of Route MM between said intersections
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$10,000,000
Section 7.010. To the Department of Economic Development
For Delta Regional Authority Organizational Dues
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ..........................................$168,945
Section 7.015. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.195
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,356,175
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 177,031
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,533,206
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,473,705
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 253,377
From Department of Economic Development - Community
Development Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123) ...............................1,727,082
Personal Service ..................................................................................................112,708
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,000
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ..................................................................................................................132,708
Personal Service ....................................................................................................56,576
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,890
From State Supplemental Downtown Development Fund (1766) ....................................60,466
Personal Service
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ............................................214,642
For an organization of sworn law enforcement officers for improving the
working conditions of law enforcement officers and the safety of
those they serve through education, legislation, information,
community involvement and employee representation
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 4
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount that
is credited to the Economic Development Advancement Fund
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ..............................................10,000
For a youth apprenticeship pilot program administered in conjunction
with a community college located in any city not within a county
that provides primary resources for encouraging, supporting and
connecting apprenticeship sponsoring companies to relevant
related technical instruction along with identifying emerging
occupations and sectors for possible new apprenticeship
opportunities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................100,000
For a 501(C)(3) community development corporation that works to
strengthen and attract investment that creates and maintains
vibrant neighborhoods and commercial districts located in any
city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................250,000
For an organization located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
helps build a healthy community by developing strategic
initiatives, vital partnerships, and intentionally targeted responses
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .................................................................... 100,000
Total (Not to exceed 60.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,128,104
Section 7.016. To the Department of Economic Development
For distribution to a nonprofit organization in a city with more than two
hundred sixty but fewer than two hundred ninety-three
inhabitants and located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants, to demolish abandoned properties provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 80/20 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$4,000,000
Section 7.020. To the Department of Economic Development
For tourism infrastructure pursuant to Section 99.585, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,500,000
For distribution to any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand
but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants for the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 5
planning, design, property acquisition, construction, renovation,
maintenance, and repair of a regional convention center complex,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................30,000,000
For a non-profit organization that is organized exclusively for charitable,
religious, educational, and scientific youth services, which will
also serve as a community center for local people located in any
city with more than fifty eight thousand but fewer than sixty-four
thousand inhabitants for the purpose of programming, the
completion of phase two of the current building expansion, finish
rehab and training facility, purchase equipment and materials,
staffing for an evidence-based curriculum program, and health
services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $6,000,000 one-time) ......................6,500,000
For the expansion of an athletic and sports training facility of a nonprofit
organization for children and youth ranging between the ages of
three to twenty-four, accounting for over three hundred twenty
five thousand participants, families, and guests in a city with
more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand
inhabitants and partially located in a county with more than
seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000
For a nonprofit organization in a county with more than one hundred fifty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, for
the planning, design, and construction of a sports park and
demolition of current structures on the planned development site,
provided that local matching funds must be provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................12,000,000
For a public agency governed by a 12-member appointed board with the
mission to make the St. Louis region a more vibrant place to live,
work and play by developing a regional network of greenways,
provided that no local match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 6
For a non-profit organization located in any city with more than one
hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants that creates opportunities for youth in the
community through sports and activities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................250,000
For an urban amphitheater that hosts Shakespeare festivals located in any
city not within a county for the purpose of schematic-level
planning and design work, landscape architecture, universal
design consulting, theatre programming and civil engineering
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For a 501(c)3 nonprofit organization in any city not within a county that
ensures grounds of the area, neighboring public spaces and
attractions will be a vital, welcoming, and well-supported
resource for the community and nation for generations to come
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For an organization located in any city not within a county that empowers
African Americans and others throughout the region in securing
economic self-reliance, social equality and civil rights
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$56,750,000
Section 7.030. To the Department of Economic Development
For an organization located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
attracts and retains high-growth tech startups
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$350,000
For an independent 501(c)(3) non-profit organization located in any city
with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in
more than one county that catalyzes economic development by
building and supporting a community of innovators, creatives and
entrepreneurs and are dedicated to making a lasting impact and
empowering individuals to thrive in the evolving innovation
landscape
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 7
For an organization that supports workforce integration and
programming activities located in any city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,750,000
For the planning, design, administration, purchase, construction,
renovations, and capital improvements for a building and
purchasing the necessary equipment, technology, furniture, and
materials for non-traditional students, young adults who are
economically disadvantaged, and their families to provide job
readiness skills, career pathways explorations, simulated
workplace incubators, financial literacy, entrepreneurship,
mental health wellness, healthy choices for the prevention of
drugs, alcohol, all forms of violence, and teen pregnancy for a
not-for-profit organization located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county that was established in 1996 and incorporated in 1999.
The recipient of these funds shall place funds in a bank escrow
account and the state of Missouri shall receive a copy of every
invoice paid. Local matching funds must be provided on a 90/10
state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,100,000
Section 7.035. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors and
Science (CHIPS) Act Program to attract semiconductor
manufacturers and suppliers to Missouri
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$10,000,000
Section 7.040. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For a grant to a public university with an established partnership with a
not-for-profit organization that has received a similar state-
funded grant for establishing Missouri in re-shoring active
pharmaceutical ingredient (API) manufacturing
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,600,000
Section 7.045. To the Department of Economic Development

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 8
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For a grant to a public university that conducts technology research and
development and manufacturing of semiconductors and has
previously received a similar state-funded grant
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,400,000
Section 7.046. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For renovation and upgrades of a facility focused on reshoring in any city
with more than eleven thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
five hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,500,000
Section 7.047. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Veterans and Job Opportunity Grant Program, as
defined in 620.3305 RSMo, for administering and disbursing
financial support to eligible employers
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$5,000,000
Section 7.050. To the Department of Economic Development
For the State Small Business Credit Initiative
From Department of Economic Development Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2451) .........................................................................................$67,986,480
Section 7.055. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For the Community Development Block Grant Program
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Economic Development – Community
Development Block Grant (Pass-Through) Fund (1118) .............................$57,318,920
For the Community Development Block Grant - Disaster Recovery
Program
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 9
From Department of Economic Development – Community
Development Block Grant (Pass-Through) Fund (1118) ...............................47,681,080
For the Community Development Block Grant - Federal Stimulus
Program
For projects to support local community development activities
From Department of Economic Development Federal Stimulus
Fund (2360) .............................................................................................. 18,399,870
Total .......................................................................................................................$123,399,870
Section 7.060. To the Department of Economic Development
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city with more than one
thousand seven hundred but fewer than one thousand nine
hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than four thousand five hundred but fewer than five
thousand inhabitants that addresses a broad cross-section of
issues, including comprehensive planning, economic
development, marketing, industrial park development, operation
of revolving loan funds, and coordination with industrial
prospects and various agencies and organizations involved in
economic development, provided that local matching funds must
be provided on a 75/25 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
For an organization that provides assistance to new and existing
businesses to help them sustain, grow, and excel located in any
city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county for the
purpose of the creation of a workforce pipeline through a career
promotion initiative that focuses on identifying career
opportunities, building awareness, and providing access to
relevant training and apprenticeships in the area
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,500,000
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city with more than seven
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants and located
in a county with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than
thirty thousand inhabitants that addresses a broad cross-section
of issues, including comprehensive planning, economic
development, marketing, industrial park development, operation

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 10
of revolving loan funds, and coordination with industrial
prospects and various agencies and organizations involved in
economic development
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 900,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,400,000
Section 7.070. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For the Missouri Main Street Program
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783)
(including $250,000 one-time).......................................................................$1,700,000
Section 7.075. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Supplemental Tax Increment Financing Fund, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.195
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$36,856,615
Section 7.080. To the Department of Economic Development
For Missouri supplemental tax increment financing as provided in
Section 99.845, RSMo. This appropriation may be used for the
following projects: Springfield Jordan Valley Park, Kansas City
Bannister Mall/Three Trails Office, Old Post Office in Kansas
City (Pershing Road), 1200 Main Garage Project in Kansas City,
Riverside Levee, Branson Landing, Eastern Jackson County Bass
Pro, Kansas City East Village Project, St. Louis Innovation
District, National Geospatial Agency West, Fenton Logistics
Park, IDEA Commons, and Lakeport Village. The presence of a
project in this list is not an indication said project is nor shall be
approved for tax increment financing. A listed project must have
completed the application process and a certificate of approval
must have been issued pursuant to Section 99.845 (10), RSMo,
before a project may be disbursed funds subject to the
appropriation.
From Missouri Supplemental Tax Increment Financing Fund (1848) ....................$36,856,615
Section 7.085. To the Department of Economic Development

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 11
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts generated by development projects, as required by
Section 99.963, RSMo, to the State Supplemental Downtown
Development Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.195
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,902,617
Section 7.090. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Downtown Economic Stimulus Act as provided in
Sections 99.915 to 99.980, RSMo
From State Supplemental Downtown Development Fund (1766) .............................$3,848,056
Section 7.095. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts generated by redevelopment projects, as required by
Section 99.1092, RSMo, to the Downtown Revitalization
Preservation Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.195
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$360,500
Section 7.100. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Downtown Revitalization Preservation Program as provided in
Sections 99.1080 to 99.1092, RSMo
From Downtown Revitalization Preservation Fund (1907) ..........................................$360,500
Section 7.105. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For the Missouri Community Service Commission
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$14,407
Personal Service ..................................................................................................383,825
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,590,451
From Community Service Commission Fund (1197) (Not to exceed
7.00 F.T.E.) .............................................................................................. 16,974,276
Total .........................................................................................................................$16,988,683
Section 7.110. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri One Start Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 12
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.195
Personal Service ................................................................................................$841,499
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 106,414
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 12.00 F.T.E.) .............................$947,913
Section 7.115. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Community College Training Program
For training of workers by community college districts
From Missouri One Start Community College Training Fund (1538) ....................$27,000,000
Section 7.120. To the Department of Economic Development
For new and expanding industry training programs and basic industry
retraining programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,116,835
From Missouri One Start Job Development Fund (1600) ................................... 126,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,242,835
Section 7.125. To the Department of Economic Development
For job training programs that provide upskill credentials
From Upskill Credential Training Fund (1849) .........................................................$6,000,000
Section 7.130. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Strategy and Performance Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.195
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,040,625
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 206,293
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,246,918
Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,337
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,832
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ..........................................................94,169
For the purpose of promoting Missouri hardwood forest products and to
educate the public on the value and benefit of such products. The
Department may contract with any statewide association
dedicated to the promotion of Missouri hardwood forest products
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 13
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ....................................................................................................... 124,710
Total (Not to exceed 14.74 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,465,797
Section 7.135. To the Department of Economic Development
For Broadband Grants
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$61,847
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,028,711
From Department of Economic Development Federal Stimulus Fund
(2360) .............................................................................................................21,090,558
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Federal Fund (1129) ...........................2,167,302
Any provider deemed incapable of fulfilling the provider’s
obligations to deploy broadband internet pursuant to Section
1.513 RSMo, shall be forever barred from the receipt of any new
state or federal monies for broadband projects if the default totals
more than 20% of obligated broadband serviceable locations
From Department of Economic Development Federal Fund (1129) ................... 1,762,424,481
Total (Not to exceed 24.00 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$1,785,682,341
Section 7.140. To the Department of Economic Development
For the response to, and analysis of, the impact of Missouri’s military
bases on the nation’s military readiness and the state’s economy
and advocacy of the continued presence and expansion of
military installations in the state, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.195
Personal Service ................................................................................................$208,564
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 442,090
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 1.50 F.T.E.) ...............................$650,654
Section 7.145. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Military Community Reinvestment Program, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.195
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$300,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 14
Section 7.150. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
7.195
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$26,237,355
Section 7.155. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Division of Tourism to include coordination of advertising of at
least $70,000 for the Missouri State Fair, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,140,035
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,542,623
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ..............................23,682,658
For the Missouri Film Office
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ...................................200,246
For a redevelopment authority to support the history and art form of
American Jazz located within a home rule city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ...................................100,000
For a museum, located within a home rule city with more than 400,000
inhabitants and located in more than one county, with archives
which highlight African-American cultural contributions and
history in Missouri
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ..................................300,000
For sponsorship of events that promote Missouri tourism
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ................................2,000,000
For celebrations during the month of June commemorating the
emancipation of black slaves in the United States
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 15
For celebrations during the month of June commemorating the
emancipation of black slaves in the United States located in any
city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................250,000
Expense and Equipment
From Tourism Marketing Fund (1650) ................................................................ 24,500
Total (Not to exceed 31.50 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$27,057,404
Section 7.160. To the Department of Economic Development
For a Missouri Route 66 Centennial Commission
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $500,000 one-time) .......................$1,500,000
Section 7.165. To the Department of Economic Development
For sponsorships, marketing, or any other activities related to the 2026
World Cup
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 7.170. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Major
Economic Convention Event in Missouri Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 7.175. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Meet in Missouri Act as provided in Section 620.1620, RSMo
From Major Economic Convention Event in Missouri Fund (1593)
(including $1,000,000 one-time) ....................................................................$2,000,000
Section 7.180. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Housing Development Commission
For general administration of affordable housing activities
For funding housing subsidy grants or loans
From Missouri Housing Trust Fund (1254) ...............................................................$6,500,000
Section 7.185. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Administrative Services Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.195

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 16
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,118,539
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................5,780
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 112,065
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,236,384
Personal Service ....................................................................................................63,161
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,777
From Department of Economic Development - Community
Development Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123) ....................................64,938
Personal Service ..................................................................................................359,384
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................1,825
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................194,585
For refunds ........................................................................................................... 12,000
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ....................................................................................................... 567,794
Total (Not to exceed 16.54 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,869,116
Section 7.190. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for payment
of administrative costs, to the Department of Economic
Development Administrative Fund
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) .................................$162,974
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ................................. 117,695
Total ..............................................................................................................................$280,669
Section 7.195. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 7.400. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Administrative Services
Personal Service ................................................................................................$254,533
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................1,911

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 17
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 47,404
From DCI Administrative Fund (1503) (Not to exceed 3.07 F.T.E.) ...........................$303,848
Section 7.405. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
administrative services, to the DCI Administrative Fund,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 7.560
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$10,000
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548) ..................................................................30,000
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ..........................................................................100,000
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) ...........................................................................37,000
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) .........................................................................8,000
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ..............................................................140,000
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .............................................. 180,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$505,000
Section 7.410. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Insurance Operations, including market conduct and financial
examinations of insurance companies, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment and further provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between funds within this section
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$11,961,471
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................9,743
Expense and Equipment ...................................................................................1,409,553
For refunds ........................................................................................................... 75,000
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) ....................................................................13,455,767
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,069,244
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................401,033
For refunds ........................................................................................................... 60,000
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552) .....................................................................4,530,277
For consumer restitution payments
From Consumer Restitution Fund (1792) ............................................................ 5,000
Total (Not to exceed 194.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,991,044

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 18
Section 7.415. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For programs providing counseling on health insurance coverage and
benefits to Medicare beneficiaries
From Federal - Missouri Department of Insurance Fund (1192) ...............................$1,650,000
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .............................................................. 200,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,850,000
Section 7.420. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Division of Credit Unions
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,576,381
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 164,605
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548) (Not to exceed 15.50
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$1,740,986
Section 7.425. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Division of Finance, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,942,567
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................878,769
For Conference of State Bank Supervisors dues .................................................. 175,000
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) (Not to exceed 105.15 F.T.E.) ..................$11,996,336
Section 7.430. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
purpose of supervising state chartered savings and loan
associations, to the Division of Finance Fund
From Division of Savings and Loan Supervision Fund (1549) ....................................$125,000
Section 7.435. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
purpose of administering the Residential Mortgage Licensing
Law, to the Division of Finance Fund
From Residential Mortgage Licensing Fund (1261) ..................................................$2,000,000
Section 7.440. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, in
accordance with Section 369.324, RSMo, to the General Revenue
Fund
From Division of Savings and Loan Supervision Fund (1549) ......................................$50,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 19
Section 7.445. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
implementation of the Missouri Family Trust Company Act
From Family Trust Company Fund (1810) .....................................................................$20,000
Section 7.450. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For general administration of the Division of Professional Registration,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,100,038
Expense and Equipment ...................................................................................1,086,395
For examination and other fees .......................................................................................102,000
For Real Estate Appraiser Committee Fees ....................................................................500,000
For refunds ........................................................................................................... 125,000
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) (Not to exceed 90.00
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$6,913,433
Section 7.455. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Accountancy
Personal Service ................................................................................................$410,551
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 250,671
From State Board of Accountancy Fund (1627) (Not to exceed 7.00
F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................................$661,222
Section 7.460. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Professional
Land Surveyors and Professional Landscape Architects
Personal Service ................................................................................................$512,739
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 306,502
From State Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Professional
Land Surveyors and Professional Landscape Architects Fund
(1678) (Not to exceed 9.00 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$819,241
Section 7.465. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners
Expense and Equipment
From State Board of Chiropractic Examiners Fund (1630) ..........................................$132,503
Section 7.470. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 20
For the State Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners
Expense and Equipment
From Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners Fund (1785) ...............................$317,062
Section 7.475. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Dental Board
Personal Service ................................................................................................$487,975
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 239,687
From Dental Board Fund (1677) (Not to exceed 7.50 F.T.E.) ......................................$727,662
Section 7.480. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors
Expense and Equipment
From Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors Fund (1633) ...................................$165,501
Section 7.485. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Registration for the Healing Arts
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,601,938
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 755,102
From Board of Registration for the Healing Arts Fund (1634) (Not to
exceed 44.00 F.T.E.) ......................................................................................$3,357,040
Section 7.490. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Nursing
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,748,109
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 580,063
From State Board of Nursing Fund (1635) ..................................................................2,328,172
For competitive grants to eligible institutions of higher education based
on a process and criteria jointly determined by the State Board of
Nursing and the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................5,000,000
From State Board of Nursing Fund (1635) .......................................................... 3,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 28.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$10,328,172
Section 7.495. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Optometry
Expense and Equipment
From Optometry Fund (1636) .........................................................................................$35,419

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 21
Section 7.500. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Pharmacy
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,607,381
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,170,977
From Board of Pharmacy Fund (1637) (Not to exceed 16.00 F.T.E.) .........................2,778,358
For a non-profit association located in any city with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants that was established in
1879 and focused on pharmacy to develop a software system to
evaluate gaps in access to medications or other interventions
among patients with chronic diseases or high-risk factors
From Board of Pharmacy Fund (1637) ................................................................ 250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,028,358
Section 7.505. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Podiatric Medicine
Expense and Equipment
From State Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund (1629) ...................................................$13,773
Section 7.510. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Real Estate Commission
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,298,700
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 278,860
From Real Estate Commission Fund (1638) (Not to exceed 25.00
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$1,577,560
Section 7.515. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Veterinary Medical Board
Expense and Equipment
From Veterinary Medical Board Fund (1639) ................................................................$59,769
Section 7.520. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
administrative costs, to the General Revenue Fund
From Professional Registration Board Funds (Various) ............................................$1,461,218
Section 7.525. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 22
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for payment
of operating expenses, to the Professional Registration Fees Fund
From Professional Registration Board Funds (Various) ..........................................$10,828,052
Section 7.530. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for funding
new licensing activity pursuant to Section 324.016, RSMo, to the
Professional Registration Fees Fund
From Board of Registration for the Healing Arts Fund (1634) ....................................$200,000
Section 7.535. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
reimbursement of funds loaned for new licensing activity
pursuant to Section 324.016, RSMo, to the appropriate board
fund
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .......................................................$320,000
Section 7.540. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Manufactured Housing
Personal Service ................................................................................................$516,757
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................354,484
For Manufactured Housing programs ...............................................................................50,000
For refunds ........................................................................................................... 10,000
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) .....................................................................931,241
For Manufactured Housing to pay consumer claims
From Manufactured Housing Consumer Recovery Fund (1909) ........................ 192,000
Total (Not to exceed 8.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,123,241
Section 7.545. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Manufactured Housing Consumer Recovery Fund
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) ...................................................................$192,000
Section 7.550. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Office of the Public Counsel, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.560

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 23
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,947,729
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 829,686
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 21.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,777,415
Section 7.555. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Public Service Commission
For general administration of utility regulation activities, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$21,500,645
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ..................................................................................................................299,206
Expense and Equipment (including $149,390 one-time) .................................2,542,587
For refunds ........................................................................................................... 10,000
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) .........................................................24,352,438
For the Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Program
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Program Fund
(1559) ....................................................................................................... 495,886
Total (Not to exceed 209.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$24,848,324
Section 7.560. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ......................................................................................$1
Section 7.800. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Director and Staff
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,837,930
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................15,431
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,397,513
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Administrative
Fund (1122) ......................................................................................................5,280,874
Expense and Equipment
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ..................... 1,010,000
Total (Not to exceed 51.65 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,290,874

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 24
Section 7.805. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for payment
of administrative costs, to the Department of Labor and Industrial
Relations Administrative Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$734,024
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) .............................................148,784
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) .............................3,586,698
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375) .........................................................................................................722,410
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2452) ................................................................................................375,388
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ................................................................1,634,622
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ............................................... 174,067
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,375,993
Section 7.810. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for payment
of administrative costs charged by the Office of Administration,
to the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Administrative Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$672,520
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) ...............................................63,954
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) .............................4,942,583
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375) ......................................................................................................1,886,822
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2452) ................................................................................................397,842
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ................................................................1,048,277
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ............................................... 128,804
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,140,802
Section 7.815. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Labor and Industrial Relations Commission, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$18,058

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 25
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo .........................................................................................................................262
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 868
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................19,188
Personal Service ..................................................................................................671,860
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................8,513
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 28,140
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ................................708,513
Personal Service ..................................................................................................615,144
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................9,663
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 30,440
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ........................................................ 655,247
Total (Not to exceed 13.59 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,382,948
Section 7.820. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards
For Administration, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ................................................................................................$124,411
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,086
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................141,497
Personal Service ..................................................................................................113,255
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 48,000
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) .............................................161,255
Personal Service ..................................................................................................135,229
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,330
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................145,559
For the Child Labor Program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between the
Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage Program, and Minimum

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 26
Wage Program, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................72,735
Expense and Equipment
From Child Labor Enforcement Fund (1826) ...................................................................79,903
For the Prevailing Wage Program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between the
Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage Program, and Minimum
Wage Program, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................136,605
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 751
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................137,356
For the Minimum Wage Program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between the
Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage Program, and Minimum
Wage Program, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................190,367
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,202
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 200,569
Total (Not to exceed 12.99 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................$938,874
Section 7.825. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards
For safety and health programs
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$72,972
Personal Service ..................................................................................................875,803
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 261,055
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) ..........................................1,136,858
Personal Service ..................................................................................................153,320

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 27
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 39,542
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ........................................................ 192,862
Total (Not to exceed 17.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,402,692
Section 7.830. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards
For mine safety and health training programs
Personal Service ................................................................................................$242,021
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 137,429
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) .............................................379,450
Personal Service ..................................................................................................104,501
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,164
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................116,665
For the Mine and Cave Inspection Program provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................140,322
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,083
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................155,405
Personal Service ....................................................................................................80,407
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 63,027
From State Mine Inspection Fund (1973) ............................................................ 143,434
Total (Not to exceed 7.23 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$794,954
Section 7.835. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the State Board of Mediation provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ................................................................................................$118,210
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,138
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 1.50 F.T.E.) ...............................$133,348
Section 7.840. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For Administration

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 28
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,029,168
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................50,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,382,595
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ..............................................................11,461,763
Personal Service ....................................................................................................65,511
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 29,836
From Tort Victims’ Compensation Fund (1622) ................................................. 95,347
Total (Not to exceed 139.25 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$11,557,110
Section 7.845. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For payment of special claims
From Workers’ Compensation - Second Injury Fund (1653) ..................................$75,060,833
Section 7.850. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For refunds for overpayment of any tax or any payment credited to the
Workers’ Compensation - Second Injury Fund
From Workers’ Compensation - Second Injury Fund (1653) .......................................$500,000
Section 7.855. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Line
of Duty Compensation Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$400,000
Section 7.860. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Line of Duty Compensation Program as provided in Section
287.243, RSMo
From Line of Duty Compensation Fund (1939) ...........................................................$400,000
Section 7.865. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For payments of claims to tort victims
From Tort Victims’ Compensation Fund (1622) ...................................................$150,000,000
Section 7.870. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 29
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, pursuant to
Section 537.675, RSMo, to the Basic Civil Legal Services Fund
From Tort Victims’ Compensation Fund (1622) .......................................................$1,300,000
Section 7.875. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,524,052
Personal Service .............................................................................................25,328,476
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,809,646
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ...........................33,138,122
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,692,274
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,600,846
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375) ....................................................................................................14,293,120
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,400,314
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,449,216
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
- 2021 Fund (2452) ..........................................................................................9,849,530
Personal Service ..................................................................................................532,558
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,143
From Unemployment Automation Fund (1953) .............................................................548,701
For information technology hardware, software, and/or system
enhancements and improvements
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,393,657
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,000,000
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ..................... 13,393,657
Total (Not to exceed 504.72 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$72,747,182
Section 7.880. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For administration of programs authorized and funded by the United
States Department of Labor, such as Disaster Unemployment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 30
Assistance (DUA), and provided that all funds shall be expended
from discrete accounts and that no monies shall be expended for
funding administration of these programs by the Division of
Employment Security
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) .........................$11,000,000
Section 7.885. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
Personal Service ................................................................................................$734,082
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,498,000
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) (Not to exceed 15.00
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$7,232,082
Section 7.890. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For the War on Terror Unemployment Compensation Program
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................................$5,000
For payment of benefits ....................................................................................... 35,000
From War on Terror Unemployment Compensation Fund (1736) .................................$40,000
Section 7.895. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For the payment of refunds set off against debts as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ...................................................................$16,000,000
Section 7.900. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Missouri Commission on Human Rights, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ................................................................................................$763,996
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,436
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................780,432
Personal Service ..................................................................................................852,085
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 104,026
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations - Commission on
Human Rights – Federal Fund (1117) ................................................................956,111

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 7 31
For the Martin Luther King, Jr. State Celebration Commission, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................55,300
From Martin Luther King, Jr. State Celebration Commission Fund
(1438) ....................................................................................................... 5,000
Total ..................................................................................................................... 60,300
Total (Not to exceed 25.70 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,796,843
Section 7.905. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Department of Economic Development Totals
General Revenue Fund (99.60 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$217,440,459
Federal Funds (57.18 F.T.E.) ................................................................................1,996,407,831
Other Funds (44.38 F.T.E.) .................................................................................. 42,398,470
Total (201.16 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$2,256,246,760
Department of Commerce and Insurance Totals
General Revenue Fund (21.00 F.T.E.) .......................................................................$7,787,416
Federal Funds ...............................................................................................................1,650,000
Other Funds (761.22 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 81,060,494
Total (782.22 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................$90,497,910
Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Totals
General Revenue Fund (22.22 F.T.E.) .......................................................................$5,099,399
Federal Funds (591.05 F.T.E.) ...................................................................................98,151,097
Other Funds (175.36 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 248,763,166
Total (788.63 F.T.E.) .............................................................................................$352,013,662
